Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.35.230

Certificates, diplomas—Signing—Contents.

Every diploma issued by a regional university shall be signed by the chair of the board of trustees and by the president of the regional university issuing the same, and sealed with the appropriate seal. In addition to the foregoing, teaching certificates shall be countersigned by the state superintendent of public instruction. Every certificate shall specifically state what course of study the holder has completed and for what length of time such certificate is valid in the schools of the state.

[ 2011 c 336 s 729; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 53. Prior: 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.230; prior: 1917 c 128 s 4; 1909 c 97 p 254 s 9; RRS s 4615; prior: 1897 c 118 s 220; 1895 c 146 s 2; 1893 c 107 s 13. Formerly RCW 28B.40.230, part; 28.81.056; 28.81.050(15).]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.